Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska64-317
Other laws applicable.

Sections 64-101 to 64-119 and 64-211 to 64-215 and the Uniform Recognition of Acknowledgments Act govern an electronic notary public unless the provisions of such sections and act are in conflict with the Electronic Notary Public Act, in which case the Electronic Notary Public Act controls.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 17.

Uniform Recognition of Acknowledgments Act, see section 64-209.